apertium-id-ms.id.metadix
    <pardef n="mengabdi/__n">
    <e c="meN-, meN-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengakal/i__n">
    <e c="meN-i, meN-kan">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar/__n">
    <e c="meN-, meN-kan, meN-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- meN- (Adv -> V) -->
    <pardef n="mengemudian/kan__adv">
    <e c="meN-kan">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- meN- (Det -> V) -->
    <pardef n="menyeluruh/__det">
    <e c="meN-">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- di- (V -> V) -->
    <pardef n="diabsen/__vblex">
    <e c="di-">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diarung/i__vblex">
    <e c="di-i">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diangkut/__vblex">
    <e c="di-, di-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diacuh/kan__vblex">
    <e c="di-kan">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diacung/__vblex">
    <e c="di-, di-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diawas/i__vblex">
    <e c="di-i, di-kan">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dialir/__vblex">
    <e c="di-, di-i, di-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- di- (N -> V) -->
    <pardef n="diadopsi/__n">
    <e c="di-">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diair/i__n">
    <e c="di-i">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dibatas/__n">
    <e c="di-, di-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diakibat/kan__n">
    <e c="di-kan">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diabdi/__n">
    <e c="di-, di-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="distribusi"><p><l>mendistribusi</l><r>distribusi</r></p><par n="mengabdi/__n" prm="distribusi"/></e>
    <e lm="komando"><p><l>mengomando</l><r>komando</r></p><par n="mengabdi/__n" prm="ngomando"/></e>
    <e lm="tinju"><p><l>meninju</l><r>tinju</r></p><par n="mengabdi/__n" prm="ninju"/></e>
    <e lm="buah"><p><l>membuah</l><r>buah</r></p><par n="mengakal/i__n" prm="buah"/></e>
    <e lm="laba"><p><l>melaba</l><r>laba</r></p><par n="mengakal/i__n" prm="laba"/></e>
    <e lm="tawa"><p><l>menertawa</l><r>tawa</r></p><par n="mengakal/i__n" prm="nertawa"/></e>
    <e lm="gema"><p><l>menggema</l><r>gema</r></p><par n="mengajar/__n" prm="gema"/></e>
    <e lm="perintah"><p><l>memerintah</l><r>perintah</r></p><par n="mengajar/__n" prm="merintah"/></e>
    <e lm="tanya"><p><l>menanya</l><r>tanya</r></p><par n="mengajar/__n" prm="nanya"/></e>
    <e lm="esok"><p><l>mengesok</l><r>esok</r></p><par n="mengemudian/kan__adv" prm="esok"/></e>
    <e lm="kemudian"><p><l>mengemudian</l><r>kemudian</r></p><par n="mengemudian/kan__adv" prm="ngemudian"/></e>
    <e lm="seluruh"><p><l>menyeluruh</l><r>seluruh</r></p><par n="menyeluruh/__det" prm="nyeluruh"/></e>
    <e lm="dompleng"><p><l>didompleng</l><r>dompleng</r></p><par n="diabsen/__vblex" prm="dompleng"/></e>
    <e lm="jambret"><p><l>dijambret</l><r>jambret</r></p><par n="diabsen/__vblex" prm="jambret"/></e>
    <e lm="sabet"><p><l>disabet</l><r>sabet</r></p><par n="diabsen/__vblex" prm="sabet"/></e>
    <e lm="jajak"><p><l>dijajak</l><r>jajak</r></p><par n="diarung/i__vblex" prm="jajak"/></e>
    <e lm="mungkir"><p><l>dimungkir</l><r>mungkir</r></p><par n="diarung/i__vblex" prm="mungkir"/></e>
    <e lm="telusur"><p><l>ditelusur</l><r>telusur</r></p><par n="diarung/i__vblex" prm="telusur"/></e>
    <e lm="gelut"><p><l>digelut</l><r>gelut</r></p><par n="diangkut/__vblex" prm="gelut"/></e>
    <e lm="juluk"><p><l>dijuluk</l><r>juluk</r></p><par n="diangkut/__vblex" prm="juluk"/></e>
    <e lm="rengek"><p><l>direngek</l><r>rengek</r></p><par n="diangkut/__vblex" prm="rengek"/></e>
    <e lm="igau"><p><l>diigau</l><r>igau</r></p><par n="diacuh/kan__vblex" prm="igau"/></e>
    <e lm="pejam"><p><l>dipejam</l><r>pejam</r></p><par n="diacuh/kan__vblex" prm="pejam"/></e>
    <e lm="wajib"><p><l>diwajib</l><r>wajib</r></p><par n="diacuh/kan__vblex" prm="wajib"/></e>
    <e lm="hangus"><p><l>dihangus</l><r>hangus</r></p><par n="diacung/__vblex" prm="hangus"/></e>
    <e lm="mohon"><p><l>dimohon</l><r>mohon</r></p><par n="diacung/__vblex" prm="mohon"/></e>
    <e lm="sudi"><p><l>disudi</l><r>sudi</r></p><par n="diacung/__vblex" prm="sudi"/></e>
    <e lm="hadir"><p><l>dihadir</l><r>hadir</r></p><par n="diawas/i__vblex" prm="hadir"/></e>
    <e lm="lalu"><p><l>dilalu</l><r>lalu</r></p><par n="diawas/i__vblex" prm="lalu"/></e>
    <e lm="renang"><p><l>direnang</l><r>renang</r></p><par n="diawas/i__vblex" prm="renang"/></e>
    <e lm="iring"><p><l>diiring</l><r>iring</r></p><par n="dialir/__vblex" prm="iring"/></e>
    <e lm="sambit"><p><l>disambit</l><r>sambit</r></p><par n="dialir/__vblex" prm="sambit"/></e>
    <e lm="tunggang"><p><l>ditunggang</l><r>tunggang</r></p><par n="dialir/__vblex" prm="tunggang"/></e>
    <e lm="intimidasi"><p><l>diintimidasi</l><r>intimidasi</r></p><par n="diadopsi/__n" prm="intimidasi"/></e>
    <e lm="sambal"><p><l>disambal</l><r>sambal</r></p><par n="diadopsi/__n" prm="sambal"/></e>
    <e lm="jembatan"><p><l>dijembatan</l><r>jembatan</r></p><par n="diair/i__n" prm="jembatan"/></e>
    <e lm="madu"><p><l>dimadu</l><r>madu</r></p><par n="diair/i__n" prm="madu"/></e>
    <e lm="ledek"><p><l>diledek</l><r>ledek</r></p><par n="dibatas/__n" prm="ledek"/></e>
    <e lm="teladan"><p><l>diteladan</l><r>teladan</r></p><par n="dibatas/__n" prm="teladan"/></e>
    <e lm="informasi"><p><l>diinformasi</l><r>informasi</r></p><par n="diakibat/kan__n" prm="informasi"/></e>
    <e lm="pentas"><p><l>dipentas</l><r>pentas</r></p><par n="diakibat/kan__n" prm="pentas"/></e>
    <e lm="komando"><p><l>dikomando</l><r>komando</r></p><par n="diabdi/__n" prm="komando"/></e>
    <e lm="tinju"><p><l>ditinju</l><r>tinju</r></p><par n="diabdi/__n" prm="tinju"/></e>
